North Dakota, session 69, SB2337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11-70 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11-70. Development by a foreign adversarycountry of concern or foreign
organization of concern - Prohibition. (Expired effective July 31, 20252027)
1. A board of county commissioners, including a board in a home rule county, may not
procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement, building plan, or proposal
relating to county development with an individual or government identified as a foreign
adversarycountry of concern or a foreign organization of concern under 15 CFR 7.4(a)
or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control sanctions listsection
47 - 01 - 09 .
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary defined under subsection
1organization of concern possessing an interest in real property if the foreign
adversaryorganization of concern:
Page No. 1 25.1327.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 40-05-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
40-05-26. Development by a foreign adversarycountry of concern or foreign
organization of concern - Prohibition. (Expired effective July 31, 20252027)
1. A board of city commissioners or city council, including a board or council in a home
rule city, may not procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement, building
plan, or proposal relating to city development with an individual or government
identified as a foreign adversarycountry of concern or foreign organization of concern
under 15 CFR 7.4(a) or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control
sanctions list section 47 - 01 - 09 .
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary as defined in subsection
1organization of concern possessing an interest in real property if the foreign
adversaryorganization of concern:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 47-01-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-01-09. Public or private ownership - All property subject to - Foreign ownership
prohibited. (Effective through July 31, 20252027)
1. All property in this state has an owner, whether that owner is the United States or the
state, and the property public, or the owner an individual, and the property private. The
state also may hold property as a private proprietor.
Page No. 2 25.1327.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following governments or entities may
not purchase or otherwise acquire title to real property in this state after July 31,
20232025:
a. A foreign adversarycountry of concern.
b. A foreign business entityorganization of concern with a principal executive office
located in a foreign country that is identified as a foreign adversaryof concern.
c. A foreign business entityorganization of concern in which a foreign
adversarycountry of concern owns:
(1) More than fifty twenty - five percent of the total controlling interests or total
ownership interests, as defined under section 10-19.1-01,interest in the
foreign business entityorganization of concern, unless the foreign business
entityorganization of concern was operating lawfully in the United States on
August 1, 2023; or
(2) Fifty Twenty - five percent or less of the total controlling interests or total
ownership interests, as defined under section 10-19.1-01,interest in the
foreign business entityorganization of concern, if the foreign adversary
country of concern controls or directs the business operations and affairs of
the foreign business entityorganization of concern without the requirement
of consent of any nonforeign adversaryfrom the committee on foreign
investment in the United States, unless the foreign business
entityorganization of concern was operating lawfully in the United States on
or before August 1, 2023.
3. When requested by a city council or commission, county commission, or title agent or
company, the attorney general shall complete a civil review, to the extent allowable by
law, relating to. Under the review, the qualifications of anyattorney general shall
determine whether a foreign adversary business entity acquiring organization of
concern is qualified and eligible to acquire real property under subdivision c of
subsection 2.
4. This section does not apply to an entitya foreign organization of concern possessing
an interest in real property under subsection 2 if the entityforeign organization of
concern:
Page No. 3 25.1327.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
5. A foreign government of a foreign country of concern or foreign business
entityorganization of concern subject to and in violation of this section shall divest itself
of all real property in this state within thirty-six months after August 1, 2023.
6. If a foreign government of a foreign country of concern or foreign business
entityorganization of concern subject to this section fails to divest itself of all real
property in this state within the period specified under subsection 4, the state's
attorney of the county in which the majority of the real property is situated may issue
subpoenas to compel witnesses to appear to provide testimony or produce records.
7. Upon receiving testimony and records, if the state's attorney concludes a foreign
government of a foreign country of concern or foreign business entityorganization of
concern, in violation of this section, has failed to divest ownership of real property as
required under this section, the state's attorney shall commence an action in the
district court of the county in which the majority of the real property is situated. Once
the action is commenced, the state's attorney shall file a notice pursuant to section
28-05-07 with the recorder of each county where the real property subject to the action
is situated. If the court finds divestment of real property under this section is proper,
the district court shall enter an order consistent with its findings. As part of the order,
the court shall cancel the notice pursuant to section 28-05-08.
8. Pursuant to an order for divestment, a foreign government of a foreign country of
concern or foreign business entityorganization of concern subject to an order shall
divest all real property within six months from the date of the final entry of judgment. A
foreign government of a foreign country of concern or foreign business
entityorganization of concern that fails to comply with the court's order is subject to a
civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars.
9. Any real property not divested within the period prescribed by law may be sold at a
public sale in the manner provided under chapter 32-19 through an action brought by
Page No. 4 25.1327.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the state's attorney. A title to real property or encumbrance on the real property may
not be deemed invalid by an order of divestiture under this section.
10. A person that is not subject to this section may not be required to:
a. Determine whether another person is subject to this section; or
b. Inquire if another person is subject to this section.
11. For purposes ofAs used in this section, "foreign adversary":
a. "Foreign country of concern" means an individual or a government identified as a
foreign adversary in 15 CFR 7.4(a)under title 15, Code of Federal Regulations,
part 791.4(a) or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control
sanctions list.
b. "Foreign organization of concern" means an organization domiciled or formed
within a foreign country of concern.
c. "Owns" means the act of holding or possessing an ownership interest in an
organization.
Public or private ownership - All property subject to. (Effective after July 31,
20252027)
All property in this state has an owner, whether that owner is the United States or the state,
and the property public, or the owner an individual, and the property private. The state also may
hold property as a private proprietor.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 47-10.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-10.1-05. Reports - Annual report to the legislative management - Penalty .
The commissioner shall monitor for compliance with this chapter all reports transmitted to
the commissioner pursuant to
1. A foreign person required to make a report to the United States department of
agriculture under the Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act of 1978 [ Pub . L .
95 - 460; 92 Stat, 1263 ; 7 U.S.C. 3501 et seq.] shall file a copy of the report with the
agriculture commissioner within the time required under title 7, Code of Federa l
Regulations, par t 781.3 . The commissioner shall make the reports available to the
public.
Page No. 5 25.1327.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. The commissioner shall provide an annual report to the legislative management by
September first of each year. The report must include the number of filings submitted
to the commissioner and the number of acres in each county owned by a foreign
person required to report under subsection 1 .
3. If a person fails to file a copy of the report required under subsection 1, the attorney
general shall impose a civil penalty of up to twenty - five percent of the fair marke t
value, as determined on the date the penalty was imposed, of the person's ownership
interest in the agricultural land in this state. The attorney general shall commence an
action to collect the civil penalty in the district court of the county in which the majority
of the real property is situated or in Burleigh County.
SECTION 5. REPEAL. Section 47-10.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 6. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 5 of this Act becomes effective on
the date the legislative council receives certification from the agriculture commissioner that the
Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act of 1978 [Pub. L. 95-460; 92 Stat, 1263; 7 U.S.C.
3501 et seq.] has been repealed.
Page No. 6 25.1327.01000